Wisconsin, session 2025, SB940.
do enact as follows:SB940,14Section 1. 18.03 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB940,2,3518.03 (2) (b) The commission may interpret the statutes enforced or 1administered by it as it considers to be necessary to effectuate the purpose of the 2statutes. The authority granted by this paragraph shall not exceed the authority 3granted by s. 227.11 (2) (a).SB940,24Section 2. 227.11 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB940,2,75227.11 (1m) No agency may promulgate rules interpreting the provisions of 6any statute enforced or administered by the agency without explicit and specific 7statutory authority.SB940,38Section 3. 227.11 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is repealed.SB940,49Section 4. 227.11 (2) (a) 1. to 3. of the statutes are renumbered 227.11 (4) to 10(6).SB940,511Section 5. 227.11 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB940,2,1612227.11 (2) (d) An agency may promulgate rules implementing or interpreting 13a statute that it will enforce or administer after publication of the authorizing 14statute but prior to the statute’s effective date. A rule promulgated under this 15paragraph may not take effect prior to the effective date of the authorizing statute 16that it implements or interprets.SB940,2,1717